North Dakota statutes. TITLE 5 Alcoholic Beverages
CHAPTER 5-01 General Provisions
5-01-17.
Domestic winery license.

The tax commissioner may issue a domestic winery license to the owner or operator of a winery located within this state to produce wine. A domestic winery may purchase, at wholesale or retail, brandy for use of onpremises fortification. A domestic winery license may be issued and renewed for an annual fee of one hundred dollars, which is in lieu of all other license fees required by this title.

A domestic winery may sell wine produced by that winery at on sale or off sale, in retail lots, and not for resale, and may sell or direct ship its wine to persons inside or outside of the state in a manner consistent with the laws of the place of the sale or delivery in total quantities not in excess of twenty-five thousand gallons [94635 liters] in a calendar year; glassware; wine literature and accessories; and cheese, cheese spreads, and other snack food items. A licensee may dispense free samples of the wines offered for sale. Subject to local ordinance, sales at on sale and off sale may be made on Sundays between eight a.m. and twelve midnight. The tax commissioner may issue special events permits for not more than forty events per calendar year to a domestic winery allowing the winery, subject to local ordinance, to give free samples of its wine and to sell its wine by the glass or in closed containers, at off-premises events. A domestic winery may not engage in any wholesaling activities. All sales and deliveries of wines to any other retail licensed premises in this state may be made only through a licensed North Dakota liquor wholesaler. For any month in which a domestic winery has made sales to a North Dakota wholesaler, that domestic winery shall file a report with the tax commissioner no later than the last day of each calendar month reporting sales made during the preceding calendar month. When the last day of the calendar month falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the due date is the first working day thereafter.

A domestic winery may obtain a domestic winery license and a retailer license allowing the onpremises sales of alcoholic beverages at a restaurant owned by the licensee and located on property contiguous to the winery.

A domestic winery may purchase wine in bulk from within and outside the state, excluding label approved containers and not to exceed four thousand gallons [15142 liters] per calendar year.

A domestic winery is subject to section 5-03-06 and shall report and pay annually to the tax commissioner the wholesaler taxes due on all wines sold by the licensee at retail, including all wines shipped directly to consumers as set forth in sections 5-03-07 and 57-39.6-02. The annual wholesaler tax reports are due January fifteenth of the year following the year sales were made. When the fifteenth of January falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the due date is the first working day thereafter. The report must provide such detail and be in a format as prescribed by the tax commissioner. The tax commissioner may require that the report be submitted in an electronic format approved by the tax commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 87, § 1; 2001, ch. 5, § 2; 2003, ch. 67, § 1; 2003, ch. 524, § 1; 2005, ch. 78, § 1; 2007, ch. 71, § 6; 2011, ch. 35, § 11; 2011, ch. 72, § 1; 2019, ch. 77, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 72, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

5-01-18.
Alcohol without liquid devices prohibited — Definition — Penalty.

A person may not sell, offer to sell, purchase, possess, use, or if that person is a retail alcoholic beverage licensee, have on the premises an alcohol without liquid device. In this section, an “alcohol without liquid device” means an apparatus that is advertised, designed, or used to vaporize an alcoholic beverage to produce a vapor that may be inhaled by an individual. The term does not include an inhaler, nebulizer, atomizer, or other device that is designed and intended specifically for medical purposes to dispense prescribed or over-the-counter medications or water.

This section does not apply to a hospital that operates primarily for the purpose of conducting scientific research, a state institution conducting bona fide research, a private college or university conducting bona fide research, or a pharmaceutical company or biotechnology company conducting bona fide research.

A violation of this section is a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 74, § 1.

5-01-19.
Domestic distillery.

The tax commissioner may issue a domestic distillery license to the owner or operator of a distillery that is located within this state which uses a majority of North Dakota farm products to manufacture and sell spirits produced on the premises. A domestic distillery license may be issued and renewed for an annual fee of one hundred dollars. This fee is in lieu of all other license fees required by this title. The tax commissioner may not issue the domestic distillery license until the applicant has established that the applicant has applied for and obtained the necessary federal registrations and permits, as required under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 [26 U.S.C. 5001 et seq.] and the federal Alcohol Administration Act [27 U.S.C. 203], for the operation of a distilled spirits plant.

A domestic distillery may sell spirits produced by that distillery at on sale or off sale, in retail lots, and not for resale, and may sell or direct ship its spirits to persons inside or outside the state in a manner consistent with the laws of the place of the sale or delivery in total quantities not in excess of twenty-five thousand gallons [94635 liters] in a calendar year. Direct sales within this state are limited to two and thirty-eight hundredths gallons [9 liters] or less per month per person for personal use and not for resale. The packaging must conform with the labeling requirements in section 5-01-16. A licensee may dispense free samples of the spirits offered for sale. Subject to local ordinance, sales at on sale and off sale may be made on Sundays between eight a.m. and twelve midnight. A domestic distillery may hold events inside and outside its premises, but only on contiguous property under common ownership, allowing free samples of its spirits and to sell its spirits by the glass or in closed containers. The tax commissioner may issue event permits for not more than forty event days per calendar year to a domestic distillery allowing the domestic distillery, subject to local ordinance, to give free samples of its product and to sell its product by the glass or in closed containers, at off-premises events. A domestic distillery may not engage in any wholesaling activities. Except as provided by section 5-01-19.1, all sales and deliveries of spirits to any other retail licensed premises in this state may be made only through a licensed North Dakota liquor wholesaler. However, a domestic distillery may sell distilled spirits to a domestic winery if the distilled spirits were produced from products provided to the domestic distillery by the domestic winery. No later than the last business day of a calendar month, a farm distillery that has made sales to a North Dakota wholesaler during the preceding calendar month shall file a report with the tax commissioner reporting those sales.

A domestic distillery may obtain a domestic distillery license and a retailer license allowing the onpremises sale of alcoholic beverages at a restaurant owned by the licensee and located on property contiguous to the domestic distillery. A domestic distillery also may own or operate a winery.

A domestic distillery is subject to section 5-03-06 and shall report and pay annually to the tax commissioner the wholesaler taxes due on all spirits sold by the licensee at retail or to a retail licensee, including all spirits shipped directly to consumers as set forth in sections 5-03-07 and 57-39.6-02. The annual wholesaler tax reports are due January fifteenth of the year following the year sales were made. The report must provide the detail and be in a format as prescribed by the tax commissioner. The tax commissioner may require that the report be submitted in an electronic format approved by the tax commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 89, § 1; 2011, ch. 35, § 12; 2011, ch. 72, § 2; 2019, ch. 78, § 1, effective April 24, 2019; 2021, ch. 72, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

This section is set out above to reflect a correction from the state since the 2015 cumulative supplement. In subsection (2) “[94625 liters]” was changed to “[94635 liters]”.

5-01-19.1.
Direct sale by domestic distilleries.

A domestic distillery that produces no more than twelve thousand proof gallons [42000 liters] of spirits per year may sell and deliver, onsite or offsite, the spirits produced by the distillery directly to licensed retailers. The distillery may sell and deliver spirits onsite to a licensed retailer that presents the retailer’s license or a photocopy of the license. The distillery may deliver the spirits offsite if the distillery:

Uses the distillery’s equipment, trucks, and employees to deliver the spirits;

Contracts with a licensed distributor to ship and deliver the spirits to the retailer; or

Contracts with a common carrier to ship and deliver the spirits to the retailer directly from the distillery or the distillery’s warehouse.

The total amount of spirits each domestic distillery may sell or deliver directly to all licensed retailers may not exceed two hundred cases per year. Individual shipments delivered by common carrier may not exceed three cases a day for each licensed retailer. A case may not exceed two and thirty-eight hundredths gallons [9 liters].

As used in this section, “proof gallon” means a gallon [3.78 liters] of liquid at sixty degrees Fahrenheit [15.5 degrees Celsius] which contains fifty percent ethyl alcohol by volume or its equivalent.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 78, § 2, effective April 24, 2019.

5-01-19.2.
Manufacturing distillery — Satellite locations.

The tax commissioner may issue a manufacturing distillery license to the owner or operator of a distillery located within this state which uses a majority of North Dakota farm products to manufacture and sell spirits produced on the premises. A manufacturing distillery license may be issued and renewed for an annual fee of one hundred dollars. This fee is in lieu of all other license fees required by this title. The tax commissioner may not issue the manufacturing distillery license until the applicant has established the applicant has applied for and obtained the necessary federal registrations and permits, as required under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 [26 U.S.C. 5001 et seq.] and the federal Alcohol Administration Act [27 U.S.C. 203], for the operation of a distilled spirits plant.

A manufacturing distillery may sell spirits produced by that distillery at off sale, in retail lots, and not for resale, and may sell or direct ship its spirits to persons inside or outside the state in a manner consistent with the laws of the place of the sale or delivery in total quantities not in excess of twenty-five thousand gallons [94635 liters] in a calendar year. Direct sales within this state are limited to two and thirty-eight hundredths gallons [9 liters] or less per month per person for personal use and not for resale. The packaging must conform with the labeling requirements in section 5-01-16. A licensee may dispense free samples of the spirits offered for sale. Subject to local ordinance, sales at off sale may be made on Sundays between twelve noon and twelve midnight. A manufacturing distillery may hold events inside its premises and at its satellite location. The tax commissioner may issue event permits for not more than forty event days per calendar year to a manufacturing distillery to allow the manufacturing distillery, subject to local ordinance, to give free samples of its product and to sell its product by the glass or in closed containers at on-premises events and at its satellite location. A manufacturing distillery may not engage in any wholesaling activities. Except as provided by section 5-01-19.1, all sales and deliveries of spirits to any other retail licensed premises in this state may be made only through a licensed North Dakota liquor wholesaler. However, a manufacturing distillery may sell distilled spirits to a domestic winery if the distilled spirits were produced from products provided to the manufacturing distillery by the domestic winery.

As used in this subsection, “samples” means the serving of free tastings of a manufacturing distillery’s products not to exceed six ounces [0.18 liter] of spirits per individual per day.

A manufacturing distillery may operate one satellite location in addition to its licensed premises for the purpose of providing samples and on sale or off sale retail sales.

The spirits sampled or sold at the satellite location must be produced by the manufacturing distillery.

A manufacturing distillery may not produce any spirits at the satellite location.

An event permit issued to a manufacturing distillery in accordance with subsection 2 for an indoor or outdoor event held at its satellite location does not count towards the forty event days per calendar year allowed under subsection 2. The manufacturing distillery may offer free samples of its spirits and may sell its spirits by the glass or in closed containers at the event held at the satellite location.

The satellite location must be owned or leased by the manufacturing distillery licensee.

A manufacturing distillery may not engage in wholesaling activities at its satellite location.

A manufacturing distillery shall obtain a satellite location license from the tax commissioner before operating a satellite location. The tax commissioner may issue and renew a satellite location license for an annual fee of one hundred dollars. This fee is in addition to all other license fees required by this title.

A manufacturing distillery is liable for any violation of alcohol or licensing requirements committed on the premises of its satellite location.

A person may not hold a manufacturing distillery license and a domestic distillery license.

A manufacturing distillery may obtain a manufacturing distillery license and a retailer license allowing the on-premises sale of alcoholic beverages at a restaurant owned by the licensee and located at the manufacturing distillery’s satellite location.

A manufacturing distillery is subject to section 5-03-06 and shall report and pay annually to the tax commissioner the wholesaler taxes due on all spirits sold by the licensee at retail or to a retail licensee, including all spirits shipped directly to consumers as set forth in sections 5-03-07 and 57-39.6-02. The annual wholesaler tax reports are due January fifteenth of the year following the year sales were made. The report must provide the detail and be in a format as prescribed by the tax commissioner. The tax commissioner may require the report to be submitted in an electronic format approved by the tax commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 73, § 1, effective March 18, 2021.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 73, S.L. 2021, provides, “

TRANSITION PERIOD.

After March 18, 2021, a domestic distillery license. After August 1, 2022, a domestic distillery licensee may not be issued a manufacturing distillery license.”

5-01-20.
Direct sale by licensed wineries.

A licensed winery that produces no more than twenty-five thousand gallons [94635 liters] of wine per year may sell and deliver, onsite or offsite, the wine produced by the winery directly to licensed retailers. The licensed winery may sell and deliver wine onsite to a licensed retailer who presents the retailer’s license or a photocopy of the license. The winery may deliver the wine offsite if the winery:

Uses the winery’s equipment, trucks, and employees to deliver the wine;

Contracts with a licensed distributor to ship and deliver the wine to the retailer; or

Contracts with a common carrier to ship and deliver the wine to the retailer directly from the winery or the winery’s bonded warehouse.

The shipments delivered by a winery’s equipment, trucks, and employees in a year may not exceed four thousand five hundred cases. A case may not exceed 2.38 gallons [9 liters].

Individual shipments delivered by common carrier may not exceed three cases a day for each licensed retailer. The shipments delivered by a common carrier in a year may not exceed three thousand five hundred cases. A case may not exceed 2.38 gallons [9 liters].

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 75, § 1; 2019, ch. 77, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2013.

5-01-21.
Brewer taproom license.

The tax commissioner may issue multiple brewer taproom licenses to the owner or operator of a brewery producing no more than twenty-five thousand barrels of malt beverages annually. A brewer with multiple taproom licenses must produce malt beverages at each location and the total amount of malt beverages produced at all locations combined may not exceed twenty-five thousand barrels of malt beverages annually. Each brewer taproom license may be issued and renewed for an annual fee of five hundred dollars, which is in lieu of all other state license fees required by this title. All provisions of this chapter which apply to a retail license must apply to a license issued under this section unless the provision is explicitly inconsistent with this section.

A brewer holding a brewer taproom license may:

Manufacture on the licensed premises, store, transport, sell, and export no more than twenty-five thousand barrels of malt beverages annually.

Sell malt beverages manufactured on the licensed premises or through a contract for consumption on the premises of the brewery or a restaurant owned by the licensee and located on property contiguous to the brewery.

Sell beer manufactured on the licensed premises or through a contract for off premises consumption in brewery-sealed containers of not more than five and sixteen-hundredths gallons [19.53 liters].

Sell and deliver beer produced by the brewery to licensed beer wholesalers.

Dispense free samples of beer offered for sale. Complimentary samples of beer may not be in an amount exceeding sixteen ounces [.47 liter] per patron.

Sell and deliver beer produced by the brewery to licensed retailers within the state, but only if:

The brewer uses the brewer’s own equipment, trucks, and employees to deliver the beer;

Individual deliveries, other than draft beer, are limited to the case equivalent of eight barrels per day to each licensed retailer;

The total amount of beer sold or delivered directly to all retailers does not exceed ten thousand barrels per year; and

A common carrier is not used to ship or deliver the brewery’s product to the public or to licensed retailers. All other sales and deliveries of beer to licensed retailers in this state may be made only through a wholesaler licensed in this state.

Sell or direct ship beer produced by the brewery to an individual in this state for consumption in accordance with section 5-01-16.

The tax commissioner may issue special event permits for not more than forty days per calendar year to a brewer taproom licensee allowing the licensee, subject to local ordinance, to give free samples of its beer, sell its beer by the glass or in closed containers, or dispense beer manufactured by the licensee at a designated trade show, convention, festival, fundraiser or other related special event hosted by a nonprofit organization unaffiliated with the brewer taproom licensee, or a similar event approved by the tax commissioner.

For any month in which a brewery has made sales to a wholesaler licensed in this state, that brewery shall file a report with the tax commissioner no later than the last day of each calendar month reporting sales made during the preceding calendar month. When the last day of the calendar month falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the due date is the first working day after that day.

A brewer taproom licensee is subject to section 5-03-06 and shall report and pay annually to the tax commissioner the wholesaler taxes due on all beer sold by the licensee at retail or to a retail licensee, including all beer sold directly to consumers as set forth in sections 5-03-07 and 57-39.6-02. The annual wholesaler tax reports are due January fifteenth of the year following the year sales were made. When the fifteenth of January falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the due date is the first working day after that day. The report must provide the detail and be in a format as prescribed by the tax commissioner. The tax commissioner may require the report be submitted in an electronic format approved by the tax commissioner.

A brewer may have multiple taproom licenses, but may not have an ownership interest in whole or in part, or be an officer, director, agent, or employee of any other manufacturer, brewer, importer, wholesaler, or retailer, or be an affiliate thereof, whether the affiliation is corporate or by management, direction, or control. A brewer may transfer beer in bulk, as defined by section 5-01-01, manufactured by the brewer to an affiliated brewer. For the purposes of this subsection, an “affiliated brewer taproom” means a licensed brewer taproom of which at least an eighty-five percent interest is owned by the brewer taproom, measured annually and:

The brewer does not own more than three affiliated brewer taprooms;

The licensed brewer taproom receiving the beer in bulk has produced no less than five thousand gallons [18927.06 liters] of beer on the premises in the preceding calendar year. For the purpose of calculating the production requirements, the production must be prorated based on the number of days beer was produced;

The beer in bulk transferred in any calendar year constitutes no more than fifty percent of the beer being produced by the licensed brewer taproom receiving the beer; and

For purposes of determining whether the twenty-five thousand barrel production limit under subsections 1 and 2 is being exceeded, the beer being transferred is credited to the brewer that manufactured the beer.

A contractee brewer may contract with a contractor brewer to produce beer for the contractee brewer to the extent allowed by federal law under the following conditions:

The contractee brewer and the contractor brewer must be licensed and owned separately;

The contractee brewer must have a proper license issued under this section and maintain a physical presence in the state;

Beer brewed for a contractee brewer counts toward the contractee brewer’s annual barrels produced, and the beer does not count toward the contractor brewer’s annual barrels produced;

The contractee brewer retains ownership of product produced by a contractor brewer; and

Each brewer is separately and distinctly responsible for compliance with this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 76, § 1; 2015, ch. 75, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 76, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 71, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2013.

5-01-22.
Powdered alcohol products prohibited — Penalty — Exceptions.

As used in this section, “powdered alcohol product” means any alcohol prepared or sold in a powder form for either direct use or reconstitution in a liquid beverage or food.

A person may not sell, offer to sell, purchase, offer to purchase, possess, or consume a powdered alcohol product.

A violation of this section is a class B misdemeanor.

This section does not apply to the use of powdered alcohol products for research by a:

Health care provider that operates primarily for the purpose of conducting scientific research;

State institution;

Private college or university; or

Pharmaceutical or biotechnology company.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 76, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

This section is set out above to reflect a correction since the 2015 cumulative supplement.
In the history citation “76” was substituted for “64”.